Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.832

Agritourism—Immunity.

(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an agritourism professional is not liable for injury, loss, damage, or death of a participant resulting exclusively from any of the inherent risks of agritourism activities.

(b) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no participant or participant's representative may pursue an action or recover from an agritourism professional for injury, loss, damage, or death of the participant resulting exclusively from any of the inherent risks of agritourism activities.

(c) In any action for damages against an agritourism professional for agritourism activity, the agritourism professional must plead the affirmative defense of assumption of the risk of agritourism activity by the participant.

(2) Nothing in subsection (1) of this section prevents or limits the liability of an agritourism professional if the agritourism professional does any one or more of the following:

(a) Commits an act or omission that is grossly negligent or constitutes willful or wanton disregard for the safety of the participant and that act or omission proximately causes injury, damage, or death to the participant.

(b) Has actual knowledge or reasonably should have known of an existing dangerous condition on the land, facilities, or equipment used in the activity or the dangerous propensity of a particular animal used in such an activity and does not make the danger known to the participant and the danger proximately causes injury, damage, or death to the participant.

(c) Permits minor participants to use facilities or engage in agritourism activities that are not reasonably appropriate for their age. This provision shall not be interpreted to relieve a parent or guardian of a minor participant of the duty to reasonably supervise the minor's participation in agritourism activities, including assessing whether the minor's participation in an agritourism activity is reasonably appropriate for his or her age.

(d) Knowingly permits participants to use facilities or engage in agritourism activities while under the influence of alcohol or drugs.

(e) Fails to warn participants as required by RCW 4.24.835.

(3) Any limitation on legal liability afforded by this section to an agritourism professional is in addition to any other limitations of legal liability otherwise provided by law.

[ 2017 c 227 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—2017 c 227: "The legislature finds that agriculture plays a substantial role in the economy, culture, and history of Washington state. As an increasing number of Washington's citizens are removed from day-to-day agricultural experiences, agritourism provides a valuable opportunity for the public to interact with, experience, and understand agriculture. In addition, agritourism opportunities provide valuable options for farmers and ranchers and rural residents to maintain their operations and continue a traditional economic development opportunity in rural areas. Inherent risks exist on farms and ranches, some of which cannot be reasonably eliminated. Uncertainty of potential liability associated with inherent risks has a negative impact on the establishment and success of agritourism operations." [ 2017 c 227 s 1.]